Washington statutes.
RCW 15.30.030

Application for license, contents—Issuance, prerequisites.

Application for a license to operate a controlled atmosphere warehouse shall be on a form prescribed by the director and shall include the following:

(1) The full name of the person applying for the license.

(2) If such applicant is an individual, receiver, trustee, firm, partnership, association, or corporation, the full name of each member of the firm or partnership or the names of the officers of the association or corporation shall be given on the application.

(3) The principal business address of the applicant in the state and elsewhere.

(4) The name of a person domiciled in this state authorized to receive and accept service or legal notices of all kinds.

(5) The storage capacity of each controlled atmosphere storage warehouse the applicant intends to operate by cubic capacity or volume.

(6) The kind of fruits or vegetables for which the applicant intends to provide controlled atmosphere storage.

(7) Any other information prescribed by the director necessary to carry out the purposes and provisions of this chapter.

The director shall issue a license to an applicant upon his or her satisfaction that the applicant has satisfied the requirements of this chapter and rules adopted hereunder and that such applicant has paid the required license fee.

[ 2010 c 8 s 6048; 1961 c 29 s 3.]